California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The applicant shall require in all contracts for the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to construct the project.

(b) Every contractor and subcontractor shall use a skilled and trained workforce to construct the project.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (e), contractors and subcontractors that fail to use a skilled and
 trained workforce shall be subject to the penalties provided in Section 2603 of the Public Contract Code. Penalties for a contractor’s or subcontractor’s failure to comply with the requirement to use a skilled and trained workforce may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the project using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 2603 of the Public Contract Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(d) For purposes of this subdivision, an applicant shall be considered to be an “awarding body” under Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Except as provided in subdivision (e), the applicant shall retain records, including copies of monthly reports, that demonstrate compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code
 while the project or contract is being performed and for three years after completion of the project or contract. The applicant shall submit these records immediately upon request of the commission. When submitted to the commission, these records shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection.

(e) Subdivisions (c) and (d) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement. The project labor agreement shall also include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Provisions requiring compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(2) Targeted hiring provisions, including a targeted hiring plan, on a craft-by-craft basis to address job access for local, disadvantaged, or underrepresented workers, as defined by a local agency.

(3) Apprenticeship utilization provisions that commit all parties to increasing the share of work performed by state-registered apprentices above the state-mandated minimum ratio required in Section 1777.5 of the Labor Code.

(4) Apprenticeship utilization provisions that commit all parties to hiring and retaining a certain percentage of state-registered apprentices that have completed the Multi-Craft Core preapprenticeship training curriculum referenced in subdivision (t) of Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 176.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.4.

(a) Within 30 days of the submission of the application, the commission shall review the application and make a determination of completeness.

(b) (1) The executive director may require the applicant to submit
 missing information in the application before an application can be deemed complete. The executive director shall transmit the request for additional information within 30 days of the submission of the application. Any further requests by the executive director for missing information in response to additional information provided by the applicant shall be made within 45 days, or as soon as practicable thereafter, of receipt of that information.

(2) The commission shall establish clear project developer permit application requirements.

(c) An application is deemed completed as follows:

(1) Thirty days after the submission of the application, if the executive director does not require the submission of missing information pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) Immediately upon a written statement from the executive director accepting all missing information requested pursuant to subdivision (b), if the executive director requires the submission of
 missing information pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) After the application is deemed complete, the executive director may request additional information from the applicant as follows:

 (1) To address comments by public agencies on the scope and content of the information that
 is required to be included in an environmental impact
 report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration for certification. The applicant shall provide to the commission the requested information within 30 days of receiving the request.

(2) If, at any time during the review of an application, the executive director determines that additional information is reasonably necessary to complete the staff assessment.

(3) The applicant shall provide to the commission the information requested pursuant to this subdivision within 30 days of receiving the request. Receipt of requested information by the commission beyond the 30-day due date may extend the 270-day period in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e)
 by a period equivalent to the delay.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), no later than 270 days after the application is deemed complete, or as soon as practicable thereafter, the commission shall determine whether to certify the environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration and to issue a certificate for the site and related facilities pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph
 (1), the time to certify the environmental impact
 report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration or issue a certificate for the site and related facilities pursuant to this chapter may be extended if one or more of the following occurs:

(A) The commission is required to recirculate the environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration pursuant to Section 15088.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Substantial changes are proposed in the project that may involve new significant environmental effects or a substantial increase in the severity of previously identified significant effects.

(C) Substantial changes occur with respect to the circumstances under which the project is undertaken that may involve new significant environmental effects or a substantial increase in the severity of previously identified significant effects.

(D) New information of substantial importance, which was not known and could not have been known with the exercise of reasonable diligence before the commission publishes the notice of availability pursuant to Section 25545.7.6, is submitted that may require additional analysis and consideration.

(E) The commission, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife or the State Water Resources Control Board, if applicable, determines that additional time is necessary to obtain information and conduct surveys, including due to seasonal constraints.

(F) The applicant files into the docket a written request that demonstrates a reasonable need for extending the time to certify the environmental impact report or issue a certificate for the site and related facilities pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Following the occurrence of any circumstance described in paragraph (2), the executive director may establish a new schedule for staff to complete its review of the application that extends the 270-day period in paragraph (1) by a period attributable to the employment of paragraph (2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 20.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.5.

(a) On or before September 28, 2022, the commission shall, in coordination with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, develop a plan that ensures timely and effective consultation between the commission and the Department of Fish and Wildlife with respect to any proposed commission findings and actions to authorize the taking of endangered, threatened, and candidate species pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) or impacts to fish and wildlife resources pursuant to Section 1602 of the Fish and Game Code. The commission shall also consult with the Department of Fish and Wildlife with respect to any proposed commission findings and actions regarding potential impacts to fish, wildlife, and plant resources and the habitats upon which
 they depend. The plan shall include a process to ensure that all such taking and impacts are consistent with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of, and Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of, the Fish and Game Code.

(b) On or before September 28, 2022, the commission shall, in coordination with the State Water Resources Control Board, develop a plan that ensures timely and effective consultation between the commission and the State Water Resources Control Board and the applicable regional water quality control board with respect to any proposed commission findings and actions related to discharges of waste that could affect the quality of waters of the state. The plan shall include provisions to ensure that all discharges are consistent with all applicable provisions of Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code.

(c) The
 commission shall, in coordination with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, develop a plan on or before September 28, 2022, that ensures timely and effective consultation between the commission and the Department of Toxic Substances Control with respect to any proposed commission findings and actions related to hazardous waste control laws.

(d) (1) For sites and related facilities located in the geographic jurisdiction of the California Coastal Commission or the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the commission shall consult with the applicable agency to coordinate processing and sequencing of the applications to expedite the permitting process of those agencies. In areas of the coastal zone covered by a certified local coastal program, the California Coastal Commission shall assume coastal development review authority, using the certified local coastal program as guidance. In the Suisun
 Marsh Secondary Management Area and the portions of the Primary Management Area with a local protection program, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission shall assume permitting authority for processing and issuing marsh development permits using the local protection programs as guidance.

(2) The California Coastal Commission, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the State Water Resources Control Board, the applicable regional water quality control boards, the applicable local air quality management districts, or the Department of Toxic Substances Control, as applicable, shall take final action on the eligible facility within 90 days after the certification by the commission of the environmental impact report, mitigated
 negative declaration, or negative declaration for the site and related facilities, if the applicant has filed a complete, final application for a permit or waste discharge requirement, as applicable, with those agencies before the certification of the environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 21.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.6.

Notwithstanding any other law, an application submitted pursuant to this chapter shall be reviewed by commission staff. The executive director shall prepare a recommendation for the commission’s consideration at a publicly noticed meeting on whether to certify an environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration and issue a certificate for the site and related facilities pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 22.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.7.

(a) The commission is the lead agency for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and, except as provided in this chapter, shall prepare an environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration pursuant to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000).

(b) The regulatory program that implements this chapter is not a certified regulatory program under Section 21080.5.

(c) The commission may prepare an initial study
 pursuant to Section 15063 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations to help identify the significant effects of an action taken pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 23.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.7.2.

The commission shall conduct public outreach to solicit input on an application to identify the range of actions, alternatives, mitigation measures, and significant effects to be analyzed in depth in the environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration as follows:

(a) Within three days after the application is deemed complete pursuant to Section 25545.4, the commission shall issue a notice of
 preparation, if applicable,
 pursuant to Section 15082 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) (1) No sooner than 10 days and no later than 30 days after the application is deemed complete pursuant to Section 25545.4, the commission shall conduct a public informational meeting as close as practicable to the proposed site. The commission shall provide notice of the informational meeting at least 10 days before the meeting. The notice shall be sent electronically to all persons who have requested to receive a notice from the commission on action related to certification pursuant to this chapter and to all persons who the commission’s executive director, in consultation with the public advisor of the commission, determines to be concerned with the application. The informational meeting shall provide all of the following:

(A) Information on the proposed site and
 related facility from the applicant and from commission staff.

(B) Information on how to participate in the commission’s review of the application.

(C) A reasonable opportunity for the public to comment on the application.

(2) No sooner than 10 days after the application is deemed complete pursuant to Section 25545.4 and, if applicable, no later than 60 days after the issuance of the notice of availability pursuant to section 25545.7.6, the commission shall conduct a public workshop in the community nearest to the proposed site. The commission shall provide the notice in the same manner as required for the notice of the
 informational meeting pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Not later than 30 days after the issuance of the notice of preparation, the commission shall conduct a public scoping meeting pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 15082 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations as close as practicable to the proposed site.

(c) The commission may conduct the informational meeting at the same time as the scoping meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 24.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.7.4.

(a) Within five days after the application is deemed complete pursuant to Section 25545.4, the commission shall submit the application to all California Native American tribes that are culturally and traditionally associated with the geographic area of the proposed site and initiate consultation, as defined in Section 65352.4 of the Government Code,
 with those tribes pursuant to Sections 21080.3.1, 21080.3.2, and 21082.3. In order to expedite compliance with this subdivision, the commission shall contact the Native American Heritage Commission for assistance in identifying any California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed development.

(b) Treatment of tribal cultural resources shall comply with Section
 21084.3.

(c) During the consultation process, the commission shall invite California Native American tribes to contribute their expertise and knowledge. The commission shall, where feasible, incorporate the California Native American
 tribes’ expertise and
 knowledge into
 an environmental impact report or other environmental document.

(d) If the commission concludes that tribal cultural resources would be adversely affected by ground disturbing activities, the commission shall
include in any license granted a requirement that tribal monitors monitor any archaeological, earthwork, and ground disturbing activities associated with the facility if monitors have been designated pursuant to this subdivision. Tribal monitors shall be designated by the California Native American tribes that are culturally or traditionally associated with the geographic area of the proposed site to observe and monitor activities at the site and may include tribal historic preservation officers and additional technically appropriate experts, as needed.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section does not conflict with the tribal cultural resource baseline standards established in Chapter 532 of the Statutes of 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 9.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.7.6.

(a) No sooner than 30 days and no later than 60 days after the issuance of the notice of availability of the draft environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration, the commission shall hold at least one public meeting on the draft environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration as close as practicable to the proposed site.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 21091, the public
 review and comment period for the draft environmental impact
 report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration
 for an application shall be at least 60 days.

(c) No sooner than 30 days after the completion of the final environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration, the commission shall consider the certification of the environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration of the application at a public meeting.

(d) This chapter does not limit the commission from holding additional public meetings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 25.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.8.

(a) For the consideration of an application and the issuance of a certification under this chapter, the commission shall comply with the requirements of subdivisions (a), (e), (g), and (h), inclusive, of Section 25523.

(b) Subdivisions (f), (g), (j), and (k) of Section 25519 and Sections 25527 and 25538 apply to an application submitted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 26.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.9.

(a) The commission shall not certify a site and related facility under this chapter unless the commission finds that the construction or operation of the facility will have an overall net positive economic benefit to the local government that would have had permitting authority over the site and related facility. For purposes of this section, economic benefits may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Employment growth.

(2) Housing development.

(3) Infrastructure and environmental improvements.

(4) Assistance to public schools and education.

(5) Assistance to public safety agencies and departments.

(6) Property taxes and sales and use tax revenues.

(b) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the construction or operation of the facility will have an overall net positive economic benefit to the local government that would have had permitting authority over the site and related facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 27.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.10.

(a) The commission shall not certify a site and related facility under this chapter unless the commission finds that the applicant has entered into one or more legally binding and enforceable agreements with, or that benefit, a coalition of one or more community-based organizations, such as workforce development and training organizations, labor unions, social justice advocates, community foundations, local governmental entities, California Native American tribes, or other organizations that represent community interests, where there is mutual benefit to the parties to the agreement. The topics and specific terms in the community benefits agreements may vary and may include workforce development, job quality, and job
 access provisions that include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Terms of employment, such as wages and benefits, employment status, workplace health and safety, scheduling, and career advancement opportunities.

(2) Worker recruitment, screening, and hiring strategies and practices, targeted hiring planning and execution, investment in workforce training and education, and worker voice and representation in decisionmaking affecting employment and training.

(3) Establishing a high road training partnership, as defined in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(b) The topics and specific terms in the community benefits agreement may also include, but not be limited to, funding for or providing specific community improvements or
 amenities such as park and playground equipment, urban greening, enhanced safety crossings, paving roads and bike paths, and annual contributions to a nonprofit or community-based organization or a community foundation that awards grants to organizations delivering community-based services and amenities.

(c) The topics and specific terms in agreements with California Native American tribes may include, but not be limited to, cultural preservation and revitalization programs, joint management and stewardship agreements, open-space preservation agreements, repatriation and reparations agreements, and other compensatory mitigation programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 28.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.11.

Sections 25532 to 25534.2, inclusive, apply to a certification issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.12.

(a) Regulations adopted to implement this chapter, or any amendment to those regulations, shall be adopted by the commission in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as an emergency, and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other of law, the emergency regulations adopted to implement this chapter shall remain in effect until amended by the commission.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, until July 1,
 2027, an agreement entered into for purposes of this chapter shall not require competitive bidding, or the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and is not required to comply with the requirements of the State Contracting Manual, the Public Contract Code, or the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) If the commission enters into an agreement with a local government pursuant to this subdivision, the commission may advance funds to the local government for purposes of the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 29.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.13.

(a) A site and related facility certified under this chapter is deemed an environmental leadership development project certified by the Governor under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 21178) of Division 13 and eligible for the procedures established under Section 21185, with no further action by the applicant or the Governor, if the commission verifies that the conditions in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 21178) of Division 13, including Sections 21183 and 21183.6, are
 met and prepares the record of the proceedings concurrently with its review of the application and certifies the record of proceedings within five days of certification.

(b) On and after January 1, 2026, if Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 21178) of Division 13 is inoperative or repealed, the procedures established pursuant to subdivision (c) shall apply to any action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report or the issuance of the certification for any site and related facility subject to this chapter, if the commission prepares the administrative record of the proceedings concurrently with its review of the application and certifies the administrative record within five days of certification.

(c) On or before December 31, 2023, the Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court to establish procedures
 that require actions or proceedings brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report or the issuance of the certification for any site and related facility subject to this chapter, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 days of the filing of the certified administrative record with the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.16.

(a) For any application submitted after January 1, 2026, the commission shall not certify an energy storage system, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25545, pursuant to this chapter, 

 unless, within 90 days of the project applicant providing notice of completion of installation to the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression, but before commencing operations or use of the batteries, the energy storage system is inspected by the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression where the system is located. The applicant shall bear the cost of the inspection. The inspector shall be provided a copy of the documentation of the consultation required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25545.19 submitted with the
 application.

(b) If the inspection required pursuant to subdivision (a) has not occurred within 90 days after the notice of completion, the commission may certify or approve for operation the energy storage system.

(c) The commission shall include findings regarding compliance with the requirements of this section in a decision to certify an energy storage system pursuant to Section 25545.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25545.19.

(a) In an application for an energy storage system, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25545, submitted in accordance with this chapter, the applicant shall certify that, 

 at least 30 days before submitting the application, the applicant met and conferred with the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression in the area where the energy storage system is proposed and discussed the energy storage system design, sought input on mitigating potential fire and life safety concerns, and sought input on the content of emergency action plans required by Section 761.3 of the Public Utilities Code. The application shall include documentation of this consultation, including the date, the names and titles of participants, a summary of matters
 discussed, and a description of how the application addresses those matters.

(b) The authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression shall have 30 days to respond to the request to meet and the meeting shall occur within 60 days of the initial request, unless otherwise agreed upon between the parties.

(c) If the authority that has jurisdiction over fire suppression declines the opportunity to meet and confer pursuant to subdivision (a), or does not respond to the request, the applicant shall document their interactions with the authority and may submit the application pursuant to this chapter.

(d) The commission shall include findings regarding compliance with the requirements of this section in a decision to certify an energy storage system pursuant to Section
 25545.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 407, Sec. 3.   (SB 283)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.3. Diablo Canyon Powerplant [25548. - 25548.8.]

25548.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Diablo Canyon powerplant currently supplies approximately 17 percent of California’s zero-carbon electricity supply and 8.6 percent of California’s total electricity supply. The Diablo Canyon powerplant’s two units are scheduled to be retired in 2024 and 2025.

(b) Preserving the option of continued operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant for an additional five years beyond 2025 may be necessary to improve statewide energy system reliability and to reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases while additional renewable energy and zero-carbon resources come online, until those new renewable energy and zero-carbon resources are adequate
 to meet demand. Accordingly, it is the policy of the Legislature that seeking to extend the Diablo Canyon powerplant’s operations for a renewed license term is prudent, cost effective, and in the best interests of all California electricity customers. The Legislature anticipates that this stopgap measure will not be needed for more than five years beyond the current expiration dates.

(c) During the time the Diablo Canyon powerplant’s operations are extended, the state will continue to act with urgency to bring clean replacement energy online to support reliability and achieve California’s landmark climate goals. The state is accelerating efforts to bring offshore wind and other clean energy resources online, including action to streamline permitting for clean energy projects.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the extension of the Diablo Canyon powerplant benefit
 California’s electric customers, and if those benefits fail to materialize or costs to operate the plant increase significantly as determined by the Public Utilities Commission, the state will plan for an earlier decommissioning date that also safeguards electrical reliability in the state.

(e) The estimated costs and timelines for design and construction of alternatives that would comply with the State Water Resources Control Board’s Resolution Number 2010-0020, Water Quality Control Policy on the Use of Coastal and Estuarine Waters for Power Plant Cooling, which were presented to the State Water Resources Control Board in accordance with Section 3.D of the Water Quality Control Policy on the Use of Coastal and Estuarine Waters for Power Plant Cooling, conclusively establish that it is not practicable for the Diablo Canyon Power Plant to achieve final compliance with the “Water Quality Control Policy on the Use of Coastal and Estuarine Waters
 for Power Plant Cooling” before October 31, 2030. Accordingly, it is the intent of the Legislature that the State Water Resources Control Board, through its authority pursuant to Resolution Number 2010-0020, continue to impose an interim mitigation fee, such as an interim mitigation fee of ten dollars ($10) per million gallons for water, subject to an annual increase, that it deems appropriate in its discretion and that does not exceed all reasonable costs to, or incurred by, the state to address the entrainment impacts resulting from the continued ocean water intakes at the Diablo Canyon powerplant after the current expiration dates set forth in Section 25548.1. 

(f) All relevant state agencies and the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant must act quickly and in coordination to take all actions necessary and prudent to extend Diablo Canyon powerplant operations.

(g) California Native American tribes maintain unique cultural, political, spiritual and community ties to the lands that now make up California, including the lands upon which the Diablo Canyon powerplant is currently sited. To ensure adequate consideration of tribal interests related to the extended operation and eventual decommissioning of the Diablo Canyon powerplant, all relevant state agencies and the operator of the Diablo Canyon powerplant should consult and work collaboratively with local California Native American tribes, including, but not limited to, designating a tribal liaison, to consider tribal access, use, conservation, and comanagement of the Diablo Canyon powerplant lands and to work cooperatively with California Native American tribes that are interested in acquiring such lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Borrower” means the company licensed to operate the Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2.

(b) “Current expiration dates” means the expiration dates in effect on June 1, 2022, of the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission operating licenses for Diablo Canyon Unit 1, which is November 2, 2024, and Unit 2, which is August 26, 2025.

(c) “Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(d) “Diablo Canyon powerplant operations” means all aspects of operating the Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2 at the Diablo
 Canyon powerplant site, including cooling operations and spent fuel management and storage facilities.

(e) “Diablo Canyon powerplant site” means the site containing the Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2, including both reactor units, spent fuel storage facilities, and appurtenant lands leased to, or controlled by, the operator.

(f) “Extension of the operating period” means license renewal by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission and any other licensing, permitting, or approvals by federal or state authorities necessary to allow continued operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant beyond the current expiration date of each unit, and until a new date that shall be no later than October 31, 2029, for Unit 1 and no later than October 31, 2030, for Unit 2. 

(g) “Fund” means the Diablo Canyon Extension Fund established
 pursuant to Section 25548.6.

(h) “Loan” means the funds loaned to the borrower by the department for the purpose of facilitating the extension of the operating period.

(i) “Loan agreement” means the agreement and any amendments to the agreement entered into by the department and the borrower pursuant to this chapter. 

(j) “Operator” means the company licensed to operate the Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2.

(k) “State agency” means any agency, department, board, office, commission, or district of the state, including, but not limited to, the State Lands Commission, the California Coastal Commission, the State Water Resources Control Board, the Public Utilities Commission, and the State Office of Historic Preservation, or any local
 government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 239, Sec. 5.   (SB 846)   Effective September 2, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25548.2.

For purposes of any application or request by the operator for a permit, lease, license, certification, concurrence, plan, decision, or other approval from a state agency, and of any request by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission for consultation or other input, that is necessary to authorize Diablo Canyon powerplant operations after the current expiration dates, all of the following shall apply:

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the state agency shall take final action on the application or request to extend the operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant within 180 days of submission of a complete application or request.

(b) Given the unique circumstances of this site and the
 time-limited extension of operations, and in view of the precedent of World Business Academy v. State Lands Commission (2018) 24 Cal.App.5th 476, the Diablo Canyon powerplant site, and all structures, buildings, and equipment at the site or necessary to extend operations at the site, shall conclusively be deemed an existing facility or existing facilities under Section 15301 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations and not subject to any exception under Section 15300.2 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, in any agency or judicial proceeding.

(c) At least 30 days before issuing any permit, lease, license, certification, concurrence, plan, decision, or other approval, some or all of the members of the State Lands Commission, the California Coastal Commission, the State Water Resources Control Board, and any other agency invited to participate by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, shall participate in a joint
 public process facilitated by the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency to consider public input concerning the environmental impacts and mitigation of extended operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant. The Natural Resources Agency shall conduct at least one public hearing, and shall receive written comments, upon which to base any findings and recommendations.

(d) The Secretary for Environmental Protection and the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall ensure coordination among, and prioritization of review of relevant applications by, the California Coastal Commission, the State Lands Commission, the State Water Resources Control Board, regional water quality control boards, and the State Air Resources Board.

(e) Except as provided in this section, this section does not alter or limit any proceeding of the commission including, but not limited to, proceedings
 planning for the decommissioning of the Diablo Canyon powerplant.

(f) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the state agencies described in subdivisions (c) and (d) and with the Public Utilities Commission shall, by January 31, 2023, provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee a detailed description and plan that identifies all the actions that are necessary for the extension of the operations of the Diablo Canyon powerplant to beyond the current expiration date of each unit, and until new dates that shall be no later than December 31, 2029, for Unit 1, and no later than December 31, 2030, for Unit 2.

(g) This section shall become inoperative once the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission concludes its review of the operator’s next applications for renewal of the licenses for Diablo Canyon Units 1 and 2, and, as of January